North Carolina, session 2025, SB197.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Transportation, Division of Aviation, the sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars
($3,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to Forsyth
County for the renovation of the Smith Reynolds Airport Maintenance Repair and Overhaul
(MRO) hangar.
SECTION 2. The funds shall be used for structural repairs, modernization, HVAC
upgrades, and necessary infrastructure enhancements.
SECTION 3. The Division shall submit a quarterly report on the use of funds to the
Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S197-v-1*